phon-exceptions.xfst
define intSym @"intermediate-symbols.a";
define ucase @"uppercase.a";
define vowel  @"vowel.a";
define boundary ⟪MB⟫|⟪RB⟫|⟪IGB⟫|intSym;

! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
! the verb roots 'de-' and 'ye-' becom di- and yi- if a suffix
! starting with a 'y' follows
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
regex e -> i || .#. [d|y]  _  boundary+ (⟪bI⟫|⟪bA⟫) [⟪by⟫|y]
   ,, e -> e || .#. d  _  boundary+ ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ p ⟪MB⟫
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
! -yor exception - `a' `e' and underspecified low-unrounded vowel `A' becomes
! corresponding high vowel before the suffix -yor
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
   .o. [a|e|⟪A⟫] -> ⟪I⟫ ||  _  boundary+ ⟪bI⟫ y o r ⟪MB⟫
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
! (s)I deletion - the morpheme (s)I is deleted in some contexts.
! What is deleted is  not clear, but we model such that (s)I gets deleted 
! - before another (s)I
! - before lArI
! - after lI, lIk, sIz, CI
! - after -(y)AsI
! - and optionally after 'aynı' and before a case suffix 
! TODO: some of these seems to be optional - at least in real world
!       use. Although 'buzdolaplı' is the correct form, there are many
!       instances of 'buzdoabılı' on the net.
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
!    ,,  ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫ -> 0 \\ l ⟪I⟫ boundary* _         ! not sure why this was here
!    ,,  ⟪compn⟫ ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫ -> 0 \\ l ⟪I⟫ boundary* _ ! this should not ever happen
    ,,  ⟪compn⟫ ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫ -> 0,
        ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫ -> 0 || _ boundary+ [ ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫
                                     | l (⟪NS⟫) ⟪A⟫ r ⟪I⟫
                                     | l ⟪I⟫
                                     | l ⟪I⟫ k
                                     | s ⟪I⟫ z
                                     | ⟪C⟫ ⟪I⟫ ] ⟪MB⟫,
                                     ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ s ⟪I⟫ boundary+ _ ⟪MB⟫,
                                     ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫ intSym* ⟪RB⟫ boundary* _ ⟪MB⟫
    ,,  ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫ (->) 0 || .#. {aynı} ⟪RB⟫ _ boundary* [ ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫
                                                       | ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫
                                                       | ⟪bn⟫ ⟪I⟫ n
                                                       | ⟪D⟫  ⟪A⟫
                                                       | ⟪D⟫  ⟪A⟫ n
                                                       | ⟪by⟫ l   ⟪A⟫ ]
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! lAr deletion - if there are multiple morphemes in a sequence with surface 
! form lAr or lArI following each other, only one survives on the surface.
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
   .o. l ⟪A⟫ r -> 0  || boundary+ _ boundary+ l ⟪A⟫ r
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! replace the intermediate symbol ⟪pass⟫ with the proper caustive
! form, and handle some lexical exceptions when passive suffix 
! is attached to a verb stem..
!
! The passive morpheme is -(I)n if the preceding letter is `l' or a 
! vowel -(I)n otherwise. 
! The other exceptions include:
!   - in the passive form of the verb stems ending with `koy'
!      `y' becomes `n' optionally (generally preferred). 
!   - the passive form of `kapa-' is `kapatıl-'.
!     we treat this change as optional, allowing both kapatıl- and
!     kapan- as passive of 'kapa'.
!   - the passive form of `anla' is `anlaşıl'
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
   .o.  y (->) n   || {ko} _     intSym* ⟪RB⟫ ⟪pass⟫ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, [..] (->) t || .#. {kapa} _ intSym* ⟪RB⟫  ⟪pass⟫ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, [..] -> ş   || .#. {anla} _ intSym* ⟪RB⟫  ⟪pass⟫ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, ⟪pass⟫ ->  ⟪bI⟫ n  //  [vowel|l] boundary+ _ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, ⟪pass⟫ ->  ⟪bI⟫ l  // \[vowel|l] boundary+ _ ⟪MB⟫
! ------------------------------------------------------------
! `n', `y' insertion/replacement after some suffixes / roots
! TODO: (informal) Fatma’ynan, şunnan, kimnen
! ------------------------------------------------------------
   .o. ⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫ -> n ⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫,
       ⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫ n -> n ⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫ n,
       ⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫ -> n ⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫,
       ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ -> n ⟪A⟫,
       ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ -> n ⟪I⟫
        || [ [s|⟪bs⟫] ⟪I⟫ | l ⟪A⟫ r ⟪I⟫ | boundary+ [i|ü] ] boundary+
            _ ⟪MB⟫,
           .#.  [{o}|{bu}|{şu}|
                 {aynı}|
                 {kendi}|{kendisi}|{kendileri}|
                 {biri}|{birisi}|{birileri}|
                 {üzeri}] boundary+ _ ⟪MB⟫

   .o. n ⟪A⟫ (->) ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫,
       n ⟪I⟫ (->) ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫
        || ⟪compn⟫ ?* [s|⟪bs⟫] ⟪I⟫ boundary+ _ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> 0
    ,, [..] -> n
           || .#. [{o}|{bu}|{şu}] boundary+ 
              _ [l ⟪A⟫ r | ⟪by⟫ l ⟪NS⟫ ⟪A⟫ | s ⟪I⟫z] ⟪MB⟫
    ,, [..] (->) ⟪bn⟫ ⟪I⟫ n
           || .#. [{sen}|{o}|{siz}|{bu}|{şu}|{kim}] boundary+ 
              _  (n) ⟪by⟫ l ⟪NS⟫ ⟪A⟫  ⟪MB⟫
    ,, [..] (->) ⟪bn⟫ ⟪I⟫ m
           || .#. [{ben}|{biz}] intSym* ⟪prn⟫ boundary+ 
              _  ⟪by⟫ l ⟪NS⟫ ⟪A⟫  ⟪MB⟫
    ,, n -> m
           || .#. [{ben}|{biz}] intSym* ⟪prn⟫ boundary+
              ⟪bn⟫ ⟪I⟫ _
    ,, [..] (->) n 
           || .#. [{kendi}|{kendisi}|{kendileri}] boundary+
              _ ⟪by⟫ l ⟪NS⟫ ⟪A⟫  ⟪MB⟫
    ,, [..] -> y
           || .#. [{o}|{bu}|{şu}] boundary+ 
              _ [⟪bI⟫ m | ⟪bI⟫ n | ⟪bI⟫ m ⟪I⟫ z|  ⟪bI⟫ m ⟪I⟫ z] ⟪MB⟫,
              .#. [{su}
                  |{özsu}
                  |{karasu}] boundary+ _ [⟪bI⟫|⟪bn⟫|⟪bs⟫]
    ,, [..] (->) y
           || .#. [{ne}
                  |{akarsu}] boundary+ 
                    _ [⟪bI⟫|⟪I⟫|⟪bn⟫|⟪bs⟫],
              .#. ucase [\⟪RB⟫]* s u intSym* [⟪RB⟫] (⟪apos⟫) [⟪IGB⟫|⟪MB⟫]+
                    _ [⟪bI⟫|⟪bn⟫|⟪bs⟫]
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! Optionally Delete (s) after a few marked nouns. The well known example is 
! cami ! -> cami-i. This deletion in current language seems to be optional
! (as of 2009-10-21 google finds ! more `camisi' than `camii').
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
   .o. ⟪bs⟫ (->) 0  || ⟪dels⟫ intSym* boundary* _ ⟪I⟫ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, ⟪dels⟫  -> 0
! ------------------------------------------------------------
! Pronoun exceptions
! - drop of final `i/ı' after içeri/dışarı
! - drop of final `a/e' after ora/bura/şura/nere
! ------------------------------------------------------------
   .o. e -> a || .#. [s|b] _ n ⟪prn⟫ intSym* ⟪RB⟫ [⟪IGB⟫|⟪MB⟫]* ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ [⟪MB⟫|⟪IGB⟫]
    ,, [ı|i] (->) 0 || .#. [{içer}|{dışar}|{iler}] _ 
                        boundary* ⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫ (n) ⟪MB⟫
    ,, [a|e] (->) 0 || .#. [{bˈur}|{şˈur}|{ˈor}|{nˈer}]  _ 
                boundary* [⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫ (n) | ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫] ⟪MB⟫
    ,, ⟪by⟫   -> y || .#. [{bura}|{şura}|{ora}|{nere}] 
                boundary* _ ⟪A⟫ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, ⟪prn⟫ -> 0
! ------------------------------------------------------------
! This is an ugly hack to allow analysis of forms like "İstiklal Marşı'mız".
! Causes unnecessary generation.
! TODO: a better, more principled analysis
! ------------------------------------------------------------
    ,, [..] (->) ⟪apos⟫ || boundary ⟪bI⟫ _ m ⟪I⟫ z boundary
;
